Arkansas, session 2025, HB1037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. TITLE. This act shall be known and may be
cited as the "Preregistration to Vote Act."

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Arkansas ranks forty-ninth (49th) among states in voter
registration and forty-eighth (48th) among states in voter turnout;
(2) High voter turnout helps ensure that the will of the people
will be respected by government, confers legitimacy on government,
strengthens popular trust in government, and enforces government
accountability;
*MBM015*
03-20-2025 10:07:42 MBM015

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 H3/20/25 HB1037
(3) The voting age is fixed by the United States Constitution at
eighteen (18) years of age;
(4) Twenty-eight (28) other states allow preregistration, in
which a person may register before eighteen (18) years of age but not vote
until eighteen (18) years of age;
(5) Research shows preregistration to have positive and
significant effects on voter turnout; and
(6) Research shows preregistration to be equally effective for
Republican and Democratic registrants.
(b) It is the intent of this act to allow preregistration for persons
seventeen (17) years of age before reaching eighteen (18) years of age.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, §
6(a)(6)(B),concerning voter registration application forms, is amended under
the authority granted by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 19, to read
as follows:
(B) “Will you be eighteen (18) years of age on or before
election day Are you seventeen (17) years of age or older?”;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 9(a), concerning
applications to register to vote, is amended under the authority granted by
Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 19, to read as follows:
(a) All persons may register who:
(1) Have not been convicted of a felony unless the person's
sentence has been discharged or the person has been pardoned;
(2) Have not been adjudged mentally incompetent by a court of
competent jurisdiction; and
(3) Meet one (1) of the following requirements:
(A) Are qualified electors who have not previously
registered;
(B) Will Except as provided in subsection (m) of this
section, will become qualified electors during the thirty-day period
immediately prior to the next election scheduled within the county; or
(C) Are seventeen (17) years of age and eligible to
register under subsection (m) of this section; or
(C)(D) Are otherwise qualified electors but whose
03-20-2025 10:07:42 MBM015

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 H3/20/25 HB1037
registration has been cancelled in a manner provided for by this amendment.
(4) Are citizens of the United States.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 9, concerning
applications to register to vote, is amended under the authority granted by
Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 19, to add an additional subsection to
read as follows:
(m)(1)(A) A person who is seventeen (17) years of age who is otherwise
eligible to register to vote under subsection (a) of this section may
register under this section.
(B) A registered voter who is seventeen (17) years of age
shall not vote in an election before turning eighteen (18) years of age.
(2)(A) A person who is seventeen (17) years of age and registers
under this section shall be added to the voter registration list with a
designation that the person is not eligible to vote until the date he or she
turns eighteen (18) years of age.
(B) The designation under subdivision (m)(2)(A) of this
section shall be removed when the person turns eighteen (18) years of age.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 41, § 14, is amended under
the authority granted by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 19, to read
as follows:
§ 14. Voter registration lists.
(a)(1) By the first day of June of each year, and at such other times
as may be practicable, all Permanent Registrars shall, and at their
discretion at other times may, print or otherwise duplicate and publish lists
of registered voters by precincts, and may distribute such lists pursuant to
§§ 7-5-105 and 7-5-109.
(2) A copy of the most current such list in each precinct shall
be furnished to the election officials at each precinct at the time the
ballot boxes are delivered and such election officials shall post said list
at a conspicuous place in the polling area.
(b)(1) By the first day of June of each year, the Permanent Registrar
shall certify to the Secretary of State the total number of registered voters
in the county, including persons who are seventeen (17) years of age and have
registered under § 9(m) of this amendment.
03-20-2025 10:07:42 MBM015

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 H3/20/25 HB1037
(2) The Secretary of State shall tabulate the total number of
registered voters in the state and shall make such information available to
interested persons upon request.
(3) The tabulation of registered voters shall include persons
who are seventeen (17) years of age and have registered under § 9(m) of this
amendment.

/s/A. Collins




























03-20-2025 10:07:42 MBM015